Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 4 O.S. 2021, Section 30.8, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 30.8. A. An animal shelter operator or commercial pet
breeder who is not in violation of the Commercial Pet Breeders and
Animal Shelter Licensing Act or any rule adopted under the
Commercial Pet Breeders and Animal Shelter Licensing Act may renew
the license of the person by:
1. Submitting a renewal application to the Oklahoma Department
of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry on the form prescribed by the
Department;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1421 Page 1

2. Complying with any other renewal requirements adopted by the
Department; and
3. Paying the required fee.
B. Any person who fails to apply for a renewal in a manner
prescribed by the Department, and whose license has expired, may not
engage in activities that require a license until the license has
been renewed.
C. Not later than sixty (60) ninety (90) days before the
expiration of the license, the Department shall send written notice
of the impending license expiration to the animal shelter operator
or commercial pet breeder at the last-known address according to the
records of the Department.
D. The Department shall provide an online license renewal and
payment option by January 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1421 Page 2